Maryland, session 2025, SB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
13–235.
(a) This section applies to the following officials:
(1) the Governor;
(2) the Lieutenant Governor;
(3) the Attorney General;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb1047*

SENATE BILL 1047
(4) the Comptroller;
(5) the State Treasurer; and
(6) a member of the General Assembly.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c), (d), or (e) of this section, during a regular
session of the General Assembly an official described in subsection (a) of this section, or a
person acting on behalf of the official, may not, as to a candidate for federal, State, or local
office[,] or a [campaign finance entity of the candidate or any other campaign finance entity
organized under this title and operated in coordination with a candidate] POLITICAL
COMMITTEE ORGANIZED UNDER THIS TITLE OR FEDERAL LAW:
(1) receive a contribution;
(2) conduct a fund–raising event;
(3) PARTICIPATE IN A FUNDRAISING EVENT AS A FEATURED GUEST
OR SPEAKER OR IN ANOTHER ROLE INTENDED TO INCREASE ATTENDANCE AT OR
THE AMOUNT OF CONTRIBUTIONS RESULTING FROM THE FUNDRAISING EVENT;
[(3)] (4) solicit a contribution; or
[(4)] (5) deposit or use any contribution of money that was not deposited
prior to the session.
(c) An official described in subsection (a) of this section, or a person acting on
behalf of the official, is not subject to this section when engaged in activities solely related
to the official’s election to an elective federal or local office for which the official is a filed
candidate.
(d) Under the Public Financing Act, a gubernatorial ticket, during the year of the
election only, may accept eligible private contributions and any disbursement of funds by
the State Board that is based on the eligible private contributions.
(e) An official described in subsection (a) of this section, or a person acting on
behalf of the official, may deposit a contribution during the legislative session if the
contribution was made electronically before the start of the session.
(f) (1) As to a violation of this section, the campaign finance entity of the
official in violation is liable for a civil penalty as provided in § 13–604.1 of this title.
(2) A civil penalty imposed under this subsection shall be distributed to the
Fair Campaign Financing Fund established under § 15–103 of this article.

SENATE BILL 1047 3
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.